Wyoming, session 2025, SF0155.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 33-26-801 through 33-26-803 are
created to read:

ARTICLE 8
EXPANDING PHYSICIAN ACCESS ACT

33-26-801. Short title.
SF0155

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0647

This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Expanding
Physician Access Act."

33-26-802. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(i) "Board" means the Wyoming state board of
medicine;

(ii) "Health care provider" means a person that
furnishes, bills or is paid for health care procedures or
service delivery in the normal course of business and
includes, without limitation, health systems, hospitals,
hospital-based facilities, freestanding emergency
facilities and urgent care clinics;

(iii) "International physician" means any person
who:

SF0155

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0647
(A) Has been granted a medical doctorate or
substantially similar degree by a domestic or international
medical program of good standing;

(B) Has been in good standing with a
medical licensing or regulatory institution of the person's
licensing country at all times in the last five (5) years
and does not have any pending discipline before the
licensing body;

(C) Has completed a residency or
substantially similar post-graduate medical training
program or has practiced as a medical professional
performing the duties of a physician in the person's
licensing country for not less than seven (7) years after
the completion of a medical doctorate;

(D) Has practiced medicine as a fully
licensed or otherwise authorized physician in the person's
licensing country for not less than five (5) years after
the completion of residency training or a residency
equivalent pursuant to subparagraph (C) of this paragraph;

SF0155

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0647
(E) Has passed steps 1, 2 and 3 of the
United States Medical Licensing Examination (USMLE); and

(F) Possesses basic fluency in the English
language.

(iv) "Physician" means any person who has
obtained a medical doctorate or substantially similar
degree and is licensed inside or outside the United States;

(v) "This act" means W.S. 33-26-801 through
33-26-803.

33-26-803. State license for health care provider
sponsored international physicians.

(a) The board shall grant a provisional license to
practice medicine in this state to any international
physician with an offer for employment as a physician at
any health care provider that operates in this state. The
board shall require an international physician to complete
an application form provided or approved by the board, pass
a criminal background investigation and pay all fees
SF0155

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0647
required by the board to obtain a provisional license. The
board:

(i) Shall not grant a provisional license to
practice medicine in this state to any international
physician unless they are eligible to obtain federal
immigration status that allows them to practice as a
physician in the United States;

(ii) Shall not grant a provisional license to
practice medicine in this state to any international
physician unless they possess a passing score on the USMLE
as provided in W.S. 33-26-802(a)(iii)(E);

(iii) May revoke a provisional license granted
under this subsection if the international physician is not
employed by a health care provider that operates in this
state during the provisional license period.

(b) The board may suspend or revoke a provisional
license granted under subsection (a) of this section
pursuant to W.S. 33-26-401 through 33-26-410. Licensees may
appeal the revocation of their provisional license in
SF0155

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0647
accordance with the requirements of W.S. 33-26-401 through
33-26-410.

(c) Provisional licenses shall automatically be
converted into full licenses to practice medicine in this
state after three (3) years of active practice under a
provisional license in this state if the licensee has not
disciplined under W.S. 33-26-401 through 33-26-410 and
subject to all of the board's rules and regulations under
the Medical Practice Act under W.S. 33-26-101 through
33-26-601.

(d) Provisional license holders shall annually
provide proof of compliance with and fulfillment of
continuing medical education requirements as required by
the board in the manner set forth by the board's continuing
medical education rules and regulations.

(e) Nothing in this section shall require the board
to license, on a provisional or full basis, an
international physician without evidence of full compliance
with the requirements under W.S. 33-26-803(a).

SF0155

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0647
(f) International physicians who are required to
obtain federal work authorization before commencing any
work for the sponsoring health care provider are eligible
to apply for a provisional license prior to receiving
federal work authorization but shall not commence work
under the provisional license without the required work
authorization.

(g) International physicians who become licensed
under subsection (a) of this section shall not need to
maintain employment with the original sponsoring health
care provider at the conclusion of the provisional
licensing period.

Section 2. W.S. 33-26-102(a)(x), 33-26-202(b) by
creating a new paragraph (xx), 33-26-301(b) by creating a
new paragraph (ix), 33-26-303(a)(intro), 33-26-305(a) and
33-26-401(e) are amended to read:

33-26-102. Definitions.

(a) As used in this chapter:

SF0155

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0647
(x) "Licensee" means any person licensed by the
board under this chapter, including a person granted a
provisional license under W.S. 33-26-801 through 33-26-803;

33-26-202. Board; duties; general powers.

(b) The board is empowered and directed to:

(xx) Adopt rules and regulations regarding
granting international physicians provisional licenses
pursuant to W.S. 33-26-801 through 33-26-803.

33-26-301. License required.

(b) Upon appropriate application, fulfillment of
eligibility criteria and successful completion of all other
requirements, the board may grant:

(ix) A provisional license to an international
physician pursuant to W.S. 33-26-801 through 33-26-803.

33-26-303. Requirements for granting license.

SF0155

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0647
(a) The board may grant a license to practice
medicine in this state as provided in the Interstate
Medical Licensure Compact, as provided by W.S. 33-26-801
through 33-26-803 or, under this article, to any applicant
who demonstrates, to the board, that he:

33-26-305. Annual renewal; expiration; reactivation
of lapsed and inactive licenses; restoration of emeritus
licenses to active status; duplicates.

(a) All licenses other than temporary licenses,
provisional licenses pursuant to W.S. 33-26-801 through
33-26-803 and medical training licenses shall lapse
annually on a date or dates to be established by rules
adopted by the board. A licensee may renew his license
each year by submitting a renewal application containing
information required by the board, accompanied by proof of
compliance with and fulfillment of continuing medical
education requirements of the board in the manner set forth
in the board s board's continuing medical education rules
and regulations and a renewal fee to the board in an amount
set by the board pursuant to W.S. 33-26-307. The licensee,
including a provisional licensee, additionally shall report
SF0155

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0647
any disciplinary action pending or taken by a state
examining board, a health care entity or the grievance
committee of a medical society during the preceding year.

33-26-401. Board duties; investigation; interview.

(e) The board retains jurisdiction over only those
licensees to whom provisional licenses under W.S. 33-26-801
through 33-26-803, temporary or full licenses were granted
and who are subject to ongoing investigation by the board,
regardless of whether the license expired, lapsed or was
relinquished during or after the alleged occurrence of
conduct proscribed by W.S. 33-26-402 by the licensee.

Section 3. The state board of medicine shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.

SF0155

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0647
Section 4.

(a) Except as provided by subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.

(b) Sections 3 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
SF0155